installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.aff
SFX A   it          te         [^o]u[bccfjlmprssvzz]it
SFX A   t           0          trit
SFX A   it          eme        trit
SFX A   it          ete        trit
SFX A   it          0          [aeiouyaeiouuye]trit
SFX A   it          me         [aeiouyaeiouuye]trit
SFX A   it          te         [aeiouyaeiouuye]trit
SFX A   t           0          [^aeioyeaeiouuyl]lit
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeioyeaeiouuyl]lit
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeioyeaeiouuyl]lit
SFX A   abit        ab         abit
SFX A   abit        abme       abit
SFX A   abit        abte       abit
SFX A   t           0          dcit
SFX A   it          eme        dcit
SFX A   it          ete        dcit
SFX A   acit        ac         acit
SFX A   acit        acme       acit
SFX A   acit        acte       acit
SFX A   ajit        aj         ajit
SFX A   ajit        ajme       ajit
SFX A   ajit        ajte       ajit
SFX A   alit        al         alit
SFX A   alit        alme       alit
SFX A   alit        alte       alit
SFX A   amit        am         amit
SFX A   amit        amme       amit
SFX A   amit        amte       amit
SFX A   apit        ap         apit
SFX A   apit        apme       apit
SFX A   apit        apte       apit
SFX A   arit        ar         arit
SFX A   arit        arme       arit
SFX A   arit        arte       arit
SFX A   asit        as         asit
SFX A   asit        asme       asit
SFX A   asit        aste       asit
SFX A   asit        as         asit
SFX A   asit        asme       asit
SFX A   asit        aste       asit
SFX A   avit        av         avit
SFX A   avit        avme       avit
SFX A   avit        avte       avit
SFX A   azit        az         azit
SFX A   azit        azme       azit
SFX A   azit        azte       azit
SFX A   ecit        ec         ecit
SFX A   ecit        ecme       ecit
SFX A   ecit        ecte       ecit
SFX A   ibit        ib         ibit
SFX A   ibit        ibme       ibit
SFX A   ibit        ibte       ibit
SFX A   icit        ic         icit
SFX A   icit        icme       icit
SFX A   icit        icte       icit
SFX A   ijit        ij         ijit
SFX A   ijit        ijme       ijit
SFX A   ijit        ijte       ijit
SFX A   ilit        il         ilit
SFX A   ilit        ilme       ilit
SFX A   ilit        ilte       ilit
SFX A   imit        im         imit
SFX A   imit        imme       imit
SFX A   imit        imte       imit
SFX A   ipit        ip         ipit
SFX A   ipit        ipme       ipit
SFX A   ipit        ipte       ipit
SFX A   irit        ir         irit
SFX A   irit        irme       irit
SFX A   irit        irte       irit
SFX A   isit        is         isit
SFX A   isit        isme       isit
SFX A   isit        iste       isit
SFX A   isit        es         isit
SFX A   isit        esme       isit
SFX A   isit        este       isit
SFX A   ivit        iv         ivit
SFX A   ivit        ivme       ivit
SFX A   ivit        ivte       ivit
SFX A   izit        iz         izit
SFX A   izit        izme       izit
SFX A   izit        izte       izit
SFX A   ybit        yb         ybit
SFX A   ybit        ybme       ybit
SFX A   ybit        ybte       ybit
SFX A   ycit        yc         ycit
SFX A   ycit        ycme       ycit
SFX A   ycit        ycte       ycit
SFX A   yjit        yj         yjit
SFX A   yjit        yjme       yjit
SFX A   yjit        yjte       yjit
SFX A   ylit        yl         ylit
SFX A   ylit        ylme       ylit
SFX A   ylit        ylte       ylit
SFX A   ymit        ym         ymit
SFX A   ymit        ymme       ymit
SFX A   ymit        ymte       ymit
SFX A   ypit        yp         ypit
SFX A   ypit        ypme       ypit
SFX A   ypit        ypte       ypit
SFX A   yrit        yr         yrit
SFX A   yrit        yrme       yrit
SFX A   yrit        yrte       yrit
SFX A   ysit        ys         ysit
SFX A   ysit        ysme       ysit
SFX A   ysit        yste       ysit
SFX A   ysit        ys         ysit
SFX A   ysit        ysme       ysit
SFX A   ysit        yste       ysit
SFX A   yvit        yv         yvit
SFX A   yvit        yvme       yvit
SFX A   yvit        yvte       yvit
SFX A   yzit        yz         yzit
SFX A   yzit        yzme       yzit
SFX A   yzit        yzte       yzit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   it          eme        [aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   it          ete        [aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   it          0          [^aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   it          me         [^aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   it          te         [^aeiouyaeiouuye]r[csz]it
SFX A   dit         d          [aeioyez]dit
SFX A   dit         dme        [aeioyez]dit
SFX A   dit         dte        [aeioyez]dit
SFX A   tit         t          [aeioye]tit
SFX A   tit         tme        [aeioye]tit
SFX A   tit         tte        [aeioye]tit
SFX A   nit         n          [aeioye]nit
SFX A   nit         nme        [aeioye]nit
SFX A   nit         nte        [aeioye]nit
SFX A   adit        ad         adit
SFX A   adit        adme       adit
SFX A   adit        adte       adit
SFX A   anit        an         anit
SFX A   anit        anme       anit
SFX A   anit        ante       anit
SFX A   t           0          stit
SFX A   it          eme        stit
SFX A   it          ete        stit
SFX A   tit         t          [^ii]stit
SFX A   tit         tme        [^ii]stit
SFX A   tit         tte        [^ii]stit
SFX A   t           0          [ii]stit
SFX A   it          eme        [ii]stit
SFX A   it          ete        [ii]stit
SFX A   atit        at         atit
SFX A   atit        atme       atit
SFX A   atit        atte       atit
SFX A   idit        id         idit
SFX A   idit        idme       idit
SFX A   idit        idte       idit
SFX A   init        in         init
SFX A   init        inme       init
SFX A   init        inte       init
SFX A   itit        it         itit
SFX A   itit        itme       itit
SFX A   itit        itte       itit
SFX A   unit        un         unit
SFX A   unit        unme       unit
SFX A   unit        unte       unit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyaeiouyue][lrz]dit
SFX A   it          eme        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lrz]dit
SFX A   it          ete        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lrz]dit
SFX A   dit         d          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]dit
SFX A   dit         dme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]dit
SFX A   dit         dte        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]dit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   it          eme        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   it          ete        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         n          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         nme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   nit         nte        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]nit
SFX A   t           0          [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]nit
SFX A   it          eme        [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]nit
SFX A   it          ete        [^aeiouyaeiouyuelr]nit
SFX A   t           0          [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   it          eme        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   it          ete        [aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         t          [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         tme        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   tit         tte        [^aeiouyaeiouyue][lr]tit
SFX A   t           m          [^cr]it
SFX A   t           s          [^cr]it
SFX A   it          i          [^cr]it
SFX A   t           me         [^cr]it
SFX A   t           te         [^cr]it
SFX A   it          i          [^cr]it
SFX A   it          eme        [bdfmnptvw]it
SFX A   it          ete        [bdfmnptvw]it
SFX A   it          eme        [^bdfmnptvwc]it
SFX A   it          ete        [^bdfmnptvwc]it
SFX A   it          e          [bdfmnptvw]it
SFX A   it          e          [^bdfmnptvwc]it
SFX A   t           c          [^cr]it
SFX A   t           ce         [^cr]it
SFX A   it          il         [^cr]it
SFX A   it          ila        [^cr]it
SFX A   it          ilo        [^cr]it
SFX A   it          ili        [^cr]it
