installation/solr-6.x/kramerius/cs_CZ_ascii.dic
akumulovat/ATN
arestovat/ATN
balancovat/ATN
blafovat/ATN
botanizovat/ATN
bulikovat/ATN
ciselovat/ATN
carnout/AN
dalnopisovat/AT
dekatovat/ATN
denominovat/ATN
dezinterpretovat/ATN
dlabat/AJTN
dobourit/ATN
docesat/AJTN
doeliminovat/ATN
dohnist/AN
dochroptet/ATN
doklucit/ATN
dokrajet/ATN
doladit/ATN
dolupovat/ATN
domorit/ATN
dootevrit/ATN
doplnit/ATN
doprystit/ATN
dorozmazat/ATN
doskakat/ATN
dospurtovat/AN
dosvitnout/AN
dospinit/ATN
dotlacovat/ATN
dovalcit/ATN
dovrsit/ATN
dozvedet/AN
drnknout/AN
ekologizovat/ATN
expedovat/ATN
fiknout/ATN
frazovat/ATN
graduovat/ATN
hasterit/AN
hnusit/ATN
hranit/AN
hustit/ACN
choulit/ATN
imatrikulovat/ATN
inkriminovat/AN
ionisovat/ATN
kabonit/AN
kartonovat/ATN
klicit/ATN
kocovat/AN
kompotovat/ATN
kontaktovat/ATN
korenit/ATN
kratit/ACN
krisit/ACN
kvalifikovat/ATN
lamat/ATN
lexikalizovat/ATN
lomozit/AN
manifestovat/ATN
menit/ATXN
mnouknout/AN
mrzacit/ATN
nabarvit/ATN
nacernit/ATN
nadlabnout/ATN
nadzdvihnout/ACN
nahovorit/ATN
nakapsovat/ATN
nakourit/ATN
nakynout/ATN
nalomit/ATN
namokrit/AN
napenit/ATN
naprasknout/ATN
narukovat/AN
naskicovat/ATN
nastolovat/ATN
nasetrit/ATN
natect/AN
navazet/AJTN
navyknout/ATN
nezvat/AT
obdivovat/ATN
objevit/ATN
oblibit/ATN
obrecet/ATN
obstipovat/ATN
ocukrovat/ATN
odbocovat/ATN
oddelit/ATN
odfrancouzstit/ATN
odhumanizovat/ATN
odklizit/ATN
odkulit/ATN
odlitnout/AN
odmlcet/AN
odpalovat/ATN
odpluchovat/ATN
odradit/ACN
odsedet/ATN
odstranit/ATN
odslapovat/AN
odtlakovat/ATN
odvelet/ATN
odzbrojovat/ATN
ohoblovat/ATN
ochromit/ATN
okounet/AN
olizat/AJTN
omrknout/ATN
opisovat/ATN
opozdit/ACN
organisovat/ATN
oslepnout/AN
osusovat/ATN
otapetovat/ATN
ovanout/ATN
oznackovat/ATN
pakovat/ATN
parit/ATN
periodizovat/ATN
planyrovat/ATN
pobalovat/ATN
podbarvit/ATN
podchytnout/ATN
podnecovat/ATN
podrizovat/ATN
podvolovat/ATN
pohoret/ATN
pochytnout/ATN
pokourit/ATN
polemizovat/ATN
pomatnout/ATN
ponorovat/ATN
poplest/ATN
poreferovat/ATN
poskakovat/AN
postrkovat/ATN
poskrabnout/ATN
potrebovat/ATN
povoskovat/ATN
pozlatit/ACN
prat/AT
proboxovat/ATN
prodrat/ATN
prohlasovat/ATN
projevit/ATN
prokourit/ATN
prolisovat/ATN
promocit/ATN
proplazit/AN
prosadit/ACN
prostituovat/ATN
proslehnout/ATN
protopit/ATN
provlhnout/ATN
prebarvit/ATN
precistit/ACN
predisponovat/ATN
predpestovat/ATN
predsunout/ATN
prefakturovat/ATN
prehrabat/ATN
preklepat/AJTN
prekroutit/ACN
prelepit/ATN
premest/ATN
prepalovat/ATN
preprat/ATN
presadit/ACN
prestavet/AJTN
preskrabat/AJTN
pretlumocit/ATN
prevazet/AJTN
prezkusovat/ATN
pricinovat/ATN
prihustovat/ATN
prikraslovat/ATN
prilnout/AN
priparit/ATN
pripomenout/ATN
prislibit/ATN
prisvedcovat/AN
pritlouct/ATN
privlastnovat/ATN
pujcovat/ATN
ranit/ATN
regularizovat/ATN
renderovat/ATN
revansovat/AN
roubovat/ATN
rozcvrnknout/ATN
rozdupnout/ATN
rozfofrovat/ATN
rozhresovat/ATN
rozkourit/ATN
rozletet/ATN
rozmenovat/ATN
rozohnit/ATN
rozpluzit/ATN
rozrazet/AJTN
rozstehovat/ATN
rozspendlovat/ATN
roztridit/ATN
rozvezt/ATN
rozzhavovat/ATN
reravet/AJN
sbalovat/ATN
sedlacit/AN
sesedet/ATN
sesynchronizovat/ATN
seznamovat/ATN
shybat/AJN
situovat/ATN
sklopit/ATN
skuzkovat/ATN
smilovat/ATN
snozit/ATN
sparit/ATN
spoluvytvaret/AJTN
stigmatizovat/ATN
subkategorizovat/ATN
syknout/ATN
skytnout/AN
svindlovat/ATN
tlesknout/AN
trzit/ATN
ucvrnknout/ATN
uchylit/ATXN
uleknout/AN
upadnout/AN
urokovat/ATN
ustajit/ATN
utilizovat/ATN
uvolnit/ATN
vdechovat/ATN
viset/AN
vodikovat/ATN
vskocit/AN
vybocit/ATN
vydedit/ATN
vyhaknout/ATN
vychrstnout/ATN
vykoupat/AJTN
vylikvidovat/ATN
vymrstovat/ATN
vyplazit/AN
vypuknout/ATN
vysknout/AN
vystrelovat/ATN
vystepovat/ATN
vytvarovat/ATN
vyzavodit/AN
vznitit/ACN
zabojovat/ATN
zadaptovat/ATN
zahlednout/ATXN
zachycovat/ATN
zakonzervovat/ATN
zalaskovat/ATN
zamknout/ACTN
zapazit/ATN
zapudrovat/ATN
zasitovat/ATN
zasvetit/ACN
zatancit/ATN
zauzlovat/ATN
zavtipkovat/ATN
zbudovat/ATN
zdokumetovat/ATN
zestatnovat/ATN
zhorsit/ATN
zjancit/ATN
zkonstruovat/ATN
zkysnout/AN
zmezinarodnit/ATN
znegovat/ATN
znicit/ATN
zoubkovat/ATN
zpravovat/ATN
zrcadlit/ATN
ztencit/ATN
zutulnit/ATN
zvyhodnit/ATN
